hi_desktop/foma/engpunct.lexc
!!!engpunct.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Punct +Apostrophe +DoubleApostrophe +Quotes +OpeningBracket +ClosingBracket +OpeningSqBracket +ClosingSqBracket +Comma +Hyphen +Dash +FullStop +QuestionMark +BackTick +DoubleBackTick +Colon +ExclamationMark +SemiColon 

LEXICON Root

Punctuation ;

LEXICON Punctuation

'[stem]+Punct+Apostrophe:' #;
''[stem]+Punct+DoubleApostrophe:'' #;
%"[stem]+Punct+Quotes:%" #;
([stem]+Punct+OpeningBracket:( #;
)[stem]+Punct+ClosingBracket:) #;
[[stem]+Punct+OpeningSqBracket:[ #;
][stem]+Punct+ClosingSqBracket:] #;
,[stem]+Punct+Comma:, #;
-[stem]+Punct+Hyphen:- #;
--[stem]+Punct+Dash:-- #;
.[stem]+Punct+FullStop:. #;
?[stem]+Punct+QuestionMark:? #;
`[stem]+Punct+BackTick:` #;
``[stem]+Punct+DoubleBackTick:`` #;
%:[stem]+Punct+Colon:%: #;
%![stem]+Punct+ExclamationMark:%! #;
%;[stem]+Punct+SemiColon:%; #;
